District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0853.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
Act may be cited as the “Transparency in Downcoding Amendment Act of 2026”.


Sec. 2. The Prompt Pay Act of 2002, effective July 23, 2002 (D.C. Law 14-176; D.C.
Official Code § 31-3131 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 2 (D.C. Official Code § 31-3131) is amended as follows:
(1) The existing paragraph (1) is redesignated as paragraph (1A).
(2) A new paragraph (1) is added to read as follows:
“(1) “CARC” means the Claim Adjustment Reason Codes, which provide the
reason for a financial adjustment specific to a particular claim or service referenced in the
Accredited Standards Committee X12 835 standard transaction adopted by the Department of
Health and Human Services under 45 CFR § 162.1602.”.
(3) A new paragraph (3A) is added to read as follows:
“(3A) “Downcoding” means the unilateral alteration by a health insurer of the
level of evaluation and management service code or other service code submitted on a claim,
resulting in a lower payment to the provider.”.
(4) Paragraph (5) is amended by striking the period and inserting the phrase “,
including a third-party administrator or other payer responsible for adjudicating claims on behalf
of a health insurer.”.
(5) A new paragraph (9) is added to read as follows:
“(9) “RARC” means the Remittance Advice Remark Codes, which provide
supplemental information about a financial adjustment indicated by a CARC or information
about remittance processing.”.
(b) A new section 5a is added to read as follows:
“Sec. 5a. Prohibition on downcoding.
“(a) A health insurer shall not:

“(1) Use an automated process, system, or tool to downcode a claim, including the
use of artificial intelligence;
“(2) Downcode a claim based solely on the reported diagnosis code; or
“(3) Use downcoding practices in a targeted or discriminatory manner against a
physician who routinely treat patients with complex or chronic conditions.”.
“(b) All downcoding decisions shall be made by a clinician licensed in the District and of
the same specialty as the treating provider who shall perform a documented review of the clinical
information supporting the billed service.
“(c) When a claim is downcoded, the health insurer shall notify the physician using the
appropriate CARC and RARC to clearly indicate that the claim has been downcoded and
provide:
“(1) The specific reason for the downcoding, including by reference to the clinical
criteria used to justify the downcoding;
“(2) The original and revised service codes and payment amounts;
“(3) The National Provider Identifier of the physician responsible for the
downcoding decision, as well as the physician’s credentials, board certifications, and areas of
specialty expertise and training; and
“(4) A notice of the right to appeal as provided in subsection (d) of this section.
“(d)(1) A health insurer shall provide providers with a clear and accessible process for
appealing downcoded claims, including a written or electronic notice detailing how to initiate an
appeal, contact information for the individual managing the appeal, reasonable timelines for
submission of an appeal that are no less than 180 days, and timelines for the adjudication of the
appeal.

“(2) A provider shall have the right to appeal in batches of similar claims
involving substantially similar downcoding issues, without restriction.
“(e) Any pattern or practice of discriminatory downcoding identified by the
Commissioner or other regulatory authority shall be subject to enforcement actions, including
fines, restitution, or suspension of health insurer licensure in the District.
“(f) Violations of this section shall be enforceable by the Commissioner and may include:
100 “(1) Monetary penalties of up to $50,000 per violation; and
101 “(2) Orders to reprocess improperly downcoded claims with interest.”.
102 Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
103 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
104 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
105 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
106 Sec. 4. Effective date.
107 This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
108 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
109 as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
110 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).